Utah statutes.
17-23-1.   County surveyor to be elected -- Requirement to be licensed land
surveyor -- Authority to contract with licensed land surveyor if no elected
county surveyor -- County surveyor duties.
(1) (a)  The office of the county surveyor in each county shall be filled by
election and, except as provided in Subsection (1)(b), the county surveyor
shall be a licensed professional land surveyor in the state.
(b)  In a county where the office of county surveyor is consolidated with
another elected office, all county surveying work shall be performed by a
licensed professional land surveyor.
(c)  In a county where there is no elected county surveyor:
(i)  the county executive or legislative body may, consistent with Section
17-53-313, contract with a licensed professional land surveyor to perform
those duties;
(ii)  all county survey work shall be done by a licensed land surveyor;
(iii)  the county recorder shall assume and perform all statutory functions
and duties of the county surveyor related to the retention and maintenance of
survey records;
(iv)  the recorder's office shall act as the county surveyor's office only for
the purpose of accepting, retaining, and managing county survey records;
(v)  the county shall furnish sufficient office space, furniture, stationery,
and record books necessary for the county recorder's office to fulfill its
functions and duties under Subsection (1)(c)(iv); and
(vi)  for purposes of this chapter, "county surveyor" means:
(A)  for purposes of the retention and management of county survey records,
the county recorder; and
(B)  except as provided in Subsection (1)(c)(vi)(A), the licensed land
surveyor under contract with the county to perform county surveyor duties.
(2)  The county surveyor shall execute:
(a)  all orders directed to the surveyor by any court; and
(b)  all orders of survey required by the county executive or county
legislative body.
(3) (a)  The surveyor of each county shall:
(i)  advise the county executive and county legislative body regarding all
surveying work;
(ii)  perform or arrange for the performance of all surveying work for the
county;
(iii)  permanently keep at county government offices at the county seat a fair
and accurate record of all surveys made, including legal descriptions and
geographic coordinates, all surveys received pursuant to Section 17-23-17, and
all corner files received pursuant to Section 17-23-17.5;
(iv)  number progressively all surveys received and state by whom and for whom
the surveys were made;
(v)  deliver a copy of any survey to any person or court requiring the survey
after the payment of the fee established by the county legislative body;
(vi)  ensure that all surveys of legal subdivisions of sections are made
according to the United States Manual of Surveying Instructions in effect at
the time the survey is completed;
(vii) verify the correctness of or establish correct coordinates for all
survey reference monuments set in place and shown on all subdivision maps and
plats which have a spatial relationship with any section or quarter section
corner; and
(viii)  perform other duties required by law.
(b)  In arranging for the performance of surveying work for the county under
Subsection (3)(a)(ii), a surveyor may comply with Section 17-53-313.
(4) (a)  The county surveyor or his designee shall establish all corners of
government surveys and reestablish all corners of government surveys where
corners have been destroyed and where witness markers or other evidences of
the government corners remain so that the corners established by government
survey can be positively located.
(b)  The corners shall be reestablished in the manner provided in Section
17-23-13 for establishing corners.
(c)  The county surveyor shall keep a separate record of the established and
reestablished corners of government surveys, giving the date and names of
persons present and shall provide those records to his successor when he
vacates his office.
(d)  Established or reestablished corners shall be recognized as the legal and
permanent corners.
(5)  The county executive or legislative body may direct the county surveyor
or his staff to perform engineering and architectural work if the county
surveyor or his staff is qualified and licensed to perform that work.
